Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2244SV (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 310 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Fire protection sprinkler 1 systems. 2 1. The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state 3 building code a prohibition on the required installation of 4 a fire protection sprinkler system in a series of attached 5 single-family residences consisting of fewer than seven units. 6 2. A local building regulation shall not require the 7 installation of a fire protection sprinkler system in a series 8 of attached single-family residences consisting of fewer than 9 seven units. 10